Louisiana, session 2026, SB107.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. A special statewide election shall be held on Saturday, April 17, 2027, for
the purpose of submitting to the electors of the state proposed constitutional amendments
contained in joint resolutions concurred in by each house of the legislature during the 2026
Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana.
Section 2. The election for which provision is made in this Act shall be held in
compliance with and subject to the applicable provisions of the Louisiana Election Code.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Section 4. This Act shall be void and of no effect if no proposed constitutional
amendment as contained in a joint resolution that specifies the special statewide election
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 107 ENROLLED
provided in this Act as the statewide election at which the proposed constitutional
amendment shall be submitted to the electors is concurred in by each house of the legislature
during the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.